Utah statutes.
11-36a-303.   Impact fee analysis.

(1)  Subject to the notice requirements of Section 11-36a-504, each local political subdivision or private entity intending to impose an impact fee shall prepare a written analysis of each impact fee.

(2)  Each local political subdivision or private entity that prepares an impact fee analysis under Subsection (1) shall also prepare a summary of the impact fee analysis designed to be understood by a lay person.



Enacted by Chapter 47, 2011 General Session

